Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4620
Disposition of unappointed property under released or unexercised general power.

To the extent a powerholder releases or fails to exercise a general power of appointment other than a power to withdraw property from, revoke, or amend a trust:

(1) the gift in default clause controls the disposition of the unappointed property; or

(2) if there is no gift in default clause or to the extent the clause is ineffective:

(A) except as otherwise provided in subdivision (B) of this subdivision, the unappointed property passes to:

(i) the powerholder if the powerholder is a permissible appointee and living; or

(ii) if the powerholder is an impermissible appointee or deceased, the powerholder's estate if the estate is a permissible appointee; or

(B) to the extent the powerholder released the power, or if there is no taker under subdivision (A) of this subdivision, the unappointed property passes under a reversionary interest to the donor or the donor's transferee or successor in interest.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 43.